Utah statutes.
78B-6-802.5.   Unlawful detainer after foreclosure or forced sale.
A previous owner, trustor, or mortgagor of a property is guilty of unlawful
detainer if the person:
(1)  defaulted on his or her obligations resulting in disposition of the
property by a trustee's sale or sheriff's sale; and
(2)  continues to occupy the property after the trustee's sale or sheriff's
sale after being served with a notice to quit by the purchaser.
